District of Columbia statutes.
22-3307

Destroying or defacing public records.

Whoever maliciously or with intent to injure or defraud any other person defaces, mutilates, destroys, abstracts, or conceals the whole or any part of any record authorized by law to be made, or pertaining to any court or public office in the District, or any paper duly filed in such court or office, shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned not more than 180 days, or both.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1327, ch. 854, § 844
Aug. 20, 1994, D.C. Law 10-151, § 105(o), 41 DCR 2608
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 201(j), 60 DCR 2064
Tampering with physical evidence, see § 22-723.
1981 Ed., § 22-3107.
1973 Ed., § 22-3107.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $1,000”.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 105(o) of the Omnibus Criminal Justice Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-255, June 22, 1994, 41 DCR 4286).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 201(j) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.